Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202613-824.01
Contracts relating to electric generating facility and related facilities; estimated cost; bid procedure; advertising; purchases authorized without advertising or sealed bidding; emergency declaration; effect.

(1) A joint entity shall cause estimates of the costs to be made by some competent engineer or engineers before the joint entity enters into any contract for the construction, management, ownership, maintenance, servicing, or purchase of an electric generating facility and related facilities.

(2) If the estimated cost exceeds the sum of seven hundred fifty thousand dollars, for those joint entities with a gross revenue of less than five hundred million dollars, or one million five hundred thousand dollars, for those joint entities with a gross revenue of five hundred million dollars or more, no such contract shall be entered into without advertising for sealed bids.

(3)(a) The provisions of subsection (2) of this section and sections 13-824.02 and 13-824.03 relating to sealed bids shall not apply to contracts entered into by a joint entity in the exercise of its rights and powers relating to radioactive material or the energy therefrom, any technologically complex or unique equipment, equipment or supplemental labor procurement from an electric utility or from or through an electric utility alliance, or any maintenance or repair if:

(i) The engineer or engineers certify that, by reason of the nature of the subject matter of the contract, compliance with subsection (2) of this section would be impractical or not in the public interest;

(ii) The engineer's certification is approved by a two-thirds vote of the governing body of the joint entity; and

(iii) The joint entity advertises notice of its intention to enter into such contract, the general nature of the proposed work, and the name of the person to be contacted for additional information by anyone interested in contracting for such work.

(b) Any contract for which the governing body has approved an engineer's certificate described in subdivision (a) of this subsection shall be advertised once in one or more newspapers of general circulation in the municipality or county where the principal office or place of business of the joint entity is located, or if no newspaper is so published then in a newspaper qualified to carry legal notices having general circulation therein, and in such additional newspapers or trade or technical periodicals as may be selected by the governing body in order to give proper notice of its intention to enter into such contract, and any such contract shall not be entered into prior to twenty days after the advertisement.

(4) The provisions of subsection (2) of this section and sections 13-824.02 and 13-824.03 shall not apply to contracts in excess of seven hundred fifty thousand dollars, for those joint entities with a gross revenue of less than five hundred million dollars, or one million five hundred thousand dollars, for those joint entities with a gross revenue of five hundred million dollars or more, entered into for the purchase of any materials, machinery, or apparatus to be used in facilities described in subsection (1) of this section if, after advertising for sealed bids:

(a) No responsive bids are received; or

(b) The governing body of the joint entity determines that all bids received are in excess of the fair market value of the subject matter of such bids.

(5) Notwithstanding any other provision of subsection (2) of this section or sections 13-824.02 and 13-824.03, a joint entity may, without advertising or sealed bidding, purchase replacement parts or services relating to such replacement parts for any generating unit, transformer, or other transmission and distribution equipment from the original manufacturer of such equipment upon certification by an engineer or engineers that such manufacturer is the only available source of supply for such replacement parts or services and that such purchase is in compliance with standards established by the governing body of the joint entity. A written statement containing such certification and a description of the resulting purchase of replacement parts or services from the original manufacturer shall be submitted to the joint entity by the engineer or engineers certifying the purchase for the governing body's approval. After such certification, but not necessarily before the governing body's review, notice of any such purchase shall be published once in one or more newspapers of general circulation in the municipality or county where the principal office or place of business of the joint entity is located and published in such additional newspapers or trade or technical periodicals as may be selected by the governing body in order to give proper notice of such purchase.

(6) Notwithstanding any other provision of subsection (2) of this section or sections 13-824.02 and 13-824.03, a joint entity may, without advertising or sealed bidding, purchase used equipment and materials on a negotiated basis upon certification by an engineer that such equipment is or such materials are in compliance with standards established by the governing body. A written statement containing such certification shall be submitted to the joint entity by the engineer for the governing body's approval.

(7) In the event of sudden, unanticipated, or unexpected damage, injury, or impairment to any electric generating facility or related facilities, or an order of a regulatory body which would prevent compliance with sections 13-824.01 to 13-824.03, the governing body of the joint entity may, in its discretion, declare an emergency and proceed with any necessary construction, reconstruction, remodeling, building, alteration, maintenance, repair, extension, or improvement of such electric generating facility or related facilities without first complying with the provisions of sections 13-824.01 to 13-824.03.

Laws 2007, LB636, § 2;

Laws 2008, LB939, § 1;

Laws 2011, LB155, § 1;

Laws 2026, LB1108, § 1.
July 18, 2026